Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1011
Violations; liability for expenses.

(1) In addition to any other sentence given for a violation of section 28-1009 or 28-1010, the sentencing court may order the defendant to reimburse a public or private agency for any unreimbursed expenses incurred in conjunction with the care, impoundment, seizure, or disposal of an animal involved in the violation of such section. Whenever the court believes that such reimbursement may be a proper sentence or the prosecuting attorney requests, the court shall order that the presentence investigation report include documentation regarding the nature and amount of the expenses incurred. The court may order that reimbursement be made immediately, in specified installments, or within a specified period of time, not to exceed five years after the date of judgment.

(2) Even if reimbursement for expenses is not ordered under subsection (1) of this section, the defendant shall be liable for all unreimbursed expenses incurred by a public or private agency in conjunction with the care, impoundment, seizure, or disposal of an animal. The expenses shall be a lien upon the animal.

Laws 1990, LB 50, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 551, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB360, § 3.